Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-9611
No private cause of action created.

The Investigational Drug Use Act does not create a private cause of action against a manufacturer of an investigational drug, biological product, or device or against another person or entity involved in the care of an eligible patient using the investigational drug, biological product, or device for any harm done to the eligible patient resulting from treatment if the manufacturer or other person or entity has complied in good faith with the terms of the act.

Laws 2018, LB117, § 11.
July 19, 2018